Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 9. Village and Regional Public Safety Officers.

Sec. 18.65.670.
Village public safety officers program.

There is created in the Department of Public Safety a village public safety officer program to assist local governments and villages through nonprofit regional corporations, Alaska Native organizations, or municipalities to appoint, train, supervise, and retain persons to serve as village public safety officers to administer functions relative to

the protection of life and property in rural areas of the state; and

providing probation and parole supervision to persons under supervision by communicating with and monitoring the activities and progress of these persons at the direction of probation and parole officers.

With funds appropriated for that purpose, the commissioner of public safety shall provide grants to nonprofit regional corporations and Alaska Native organizations for village public safety officers. If a nonprofit regional corporation for a rural area or Alaska Native organization declines a grant under this subsection, the commissioner may provide the grant to a municipality with a population of less than 10,000 willing to administer the grant for the rural area. Before awarding a grant to a municipality, the commissioner shall consult with the nonprofit regional corporation or Alaska Native organization that declined the grant. The commissioner of public safety shall coordinate with the commissioner of corrections when providing grants under this section, and the commissioners shall jointly execute an agreement with the nonprofit regional corporations, Alaska Native organizations, or municipalities, as appropriate.

The commissioner of public safety may adopt regulations related to village public safety officers, including minimum standards and training, criteria for participation by a community, a municipality, an Alaska Native organization, or a corporation, and the interaction between the Department of Public Safety and village public safety officers. Regulations adopted by the commissioner of public safety under this subsection may not prohibit village public safety officers who otherwise meet minimum standards and training from carrying firearms. If the commissioner of public safety adopts regulations regarding training for village public safety officers, at a minimum, that training must include disability training that provides training in the subjects set out in AS

18.65.220

(3). The commissioner of corrections may adopt regulations related to the functions of village public safety officers providing probation and parole supervision.

[Repealed, § 30 ch 92 SLA 2004.]

In this section,

“Alaska Native organization” means an organization listed in AS

47.27.070(a)

;

“rural area” means a community with a population of less than 1,000 within

the unorganized borough; or

a borough, if the community is not connected by road to Anchorage or Fairbanks.

History.

(§ 1 ch 48 SLA 1993; am §§ 4, 5 ch 97 SLA 2001; am § 30 ch 92 SLA 2004; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 49 SLA 2009; am § 1 ch 97 SLA 2014; am § 6 ch 8 SLA 2017; am §§
87 — 90 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For the intent of the legislature related to the 2001 amendments, see § 1, ch. 97, SLA 2001 in the 2001 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For powers and duties of the department, see 13 AAC 96, art. 1.

For corporation and village participation, see 13 AAC 96, art. 2.

For minimum standards, training, and certification, see 13 AAC 96, art. 3.

For definitions, see 13 AAC 96, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective August 17, 2017, in the second sentence in (c), inserted “of public safety” following “the commissioner”, added the third sentence.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (a), inserted “, Alaska Native organizations,” in the introductory paragraph; in (b), inserted “and Alaska Native organizations”, “or Alaska Native organization” in two places and “, Alaska Native organizations,”; in (c), substituted “for participation by a community, a municipality, an Alaska Native organization, or a corporation” for “for community, municipality, or corporation participation” in the first sentence; and in (e), added (e)(1), added the (e)(2) designation, and redesignated former (e)(1) and (e)(2) as (e)(2)(A) and (e)(2)(B), respectively.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 13, ch. 97, SLA 2001 provides that the amendments to this section made by ch. 97, SLA 2001 do “not modify the terms of a contract between the state and a nonprofit regional corporation in existence on the effective date of this Act.” The effective date of § 4, ch. 97, SLA 2001 was October 8, 2001. The effective date of § 5, ch. 97, SLA 2001, which enacted subsection (d), was March 1, 2002.

Sec. 18.65.680.
Regional public safety officers.

The commissioner of public safety may appoint regional public safety officers to

provide an expanded public safety and law enforcement presence in rural areas of the state;

provide oversight and training for the village public safety officer program;

administer functions relating to

protecting life and property in the rural areas of the state;

conducting investigations;

conducting search and rescue missions;

conducting local training programs in drug and alcohol awareness and prevention, water safety, and gun safety;

perform other duties relating to public safety as directed by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 6 ch 97 SLA 2001)

Cross references. —

For the intent of the legislature in enacting this section, see § 1, ch. 97, SLA 2001 in the 2001 Temporary and Special Acts.